Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Bonds and Liens for Labor and Materials

Cross references. —

As to liens generally, see title 29.

§ 41-5-201.
Contractor's bond.

Whenever any ditch or canal company, or other owner or owners, shall contract with any person, persons or corporation, for the construction of its, his or their ditch, canal or reservoir, or any part thereof, such company, owner or owners, shall take from the person, persons or corporation with whom such contract is made, a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that such contractor or contractors shall pay or cause to be paid all laborers, mechanics, material men, ranchmen, farmers, merchants and other persons who supply such contractor or contractors, or any of his or their subcontractors with labor, work, material, or goods of any kind which shall enter into or become a part of such irrigation works, which bonds shall be filed by such company or other owner in the office of the county clerk in the county where the principal work of such contractor shall be carried on; and if any such ditch or canal company, or other owner or owners, shall fail to take such bond, such ditch or canal company or other owner or owners shall be liable to the persons herein mentioned to the full extent of all such debts so contracted by such contractor, or contractors, or any of his or their subcontractors. Any such contractor or contractors may take a similar bond from each subcontractor to secure the payment of all debts of the kind above mentioned incurred by him, and file the same as above provided. All such persons mentioned in this section to whom any debt of the kind above mentioned shall be due from any contractor or subcontractor shall severally have a right of action upon any such bond covering such debt taken as herein provided for the recovery of the full amount of such debt. Provided, however, that in order that the right of action upon such bonds may exist, such persons or parties herein granted such right shall comply with either of the following conditions, to-wit, first, an action in a court of competent jurisdiction, in the county where such bond is filed, shall be commenced within ninety (90) days after the last item of indebtedness shall have accrued; or, second, an itemized statement of the indebtedness duly verified, shall, within ninety (90) days after the last item of such indebtedness shall have accrued, be filed in the office of the county clerk of the proper county; and an action shall be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction of such county within three (3) months after the filing of such statement. In case an action is commenced upon the bond of a contractor liable for the claim, and in such case the result of such action shall be binding upon the subcontractor, and his sureties, and in any case when a contractor has paid a claim for which a subcontractor is liable, such contractor shall bring action against the subcontractor and his sureties within sixty (60) days after the payment of such claim.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 78, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3824; C.S. 1920, § 4887; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 74; R.S. 1931, § 122-601; C.S. 1945, § 71-2401; W.S. 1957, § 41-227; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to public works and contractor's bond generally, see §§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in the first sentence.

Not applicable to drainage districts. —

The provisions of §§

41-5-201

through

41-5-203

are inconsistent with policy of the drainage district act, and do not apply to construction work performed for drainage districts. Dickey v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 39 L.R.A. (n.s.) 868 (1912).

§ 41-5-202.
Statement of mechanic's lien; delivery to owner of ditch; retention of unpaid amount from subsequent payments to contractor.

Every laborer, mechanic, ranchman, farmer, merchant or other person performing any work or labor or furnishing any material, or goods of any kind which enter into and become a part of such irrigation works, to any contractor or subcontractor in the construction of any ditch, canal or reservoir, or any part thereof used by such contractor or subcontractor in carrying on said work of construction, whose demand has not been paid, may deliver to the owner or owners of such ditch, canal or reservoir, or to its, his or their agent, a verified statement of the account, and thereupon such owner or owners or its, his or their agent, shall retain out of the subsequent payments to the contractor or contractors the amount of such unpaid account for the benefit of the person to whom the same is due.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 78, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 3824; C.S. 1920, § 4888; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 75; R.S. 1931, § 122-602; C.S. 1945, § 71-2402; W.S. 1957, § 41-228.

Not applicable to drainage districts. —

The provisions of §§

41-5-201

through

41-5-203

are inconsistent with the policy of the drainage district act, and do not apply to construction work performed for drainage districts. Dickey v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 39 L.R.A. (n.s.) 868 (1912).

§ 41-5-203.
Statement of mechanic's lien; delivery of copy to contractor; time limits for disputing claims; recovery by civil action; application of W.S. 41-5-201 through 41-5-203.

Whenever any verified account mentioned in W.S.

41-5-202

shall be placed in the hands of any such owner or owners or its, his or their agent, as above stated, it shall be the duty of such owner or owners to furnish the contractor with a copy of such verified account, so that if there be any disagreement between the debtor and creditor as to the amount due the same may be amicably adjusted, and if the contractor, or subcontractor if he be the debtor, shall not, within ten (10) days after the receipt of such account, give the said owner or owners or its, his or their agent, written notice that the claim is disputed, he shall be considered as assenting to its payment, and the owner or owners or its, his or their agent, shall be justified in paying the same when due and charging the same to the contractor. The person or persons to whom any such debt is due and who shall deliver a verified account thereof as above provided, may recover the amount thereof in an action at law, to the extent of any balance due by such owner or owners to the contractor at or after the time of delivering the verified account. Provided, that nothing contained in this section or in W.S.

41-5-202

shall interfere with the right of action upon the bond or bonds provided for in W.S.

41-5-201

, or against the company or other owner, for the full amount of any such debt in case of a failure to take a bond.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 78, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 3825; C.S. 1920, § 4889; R.S. 1931, § 122-603; C.S. 1945, § 71-2403; W.S. 1957, § 41-229.

Not applicable to drainage districts. —

The provisions of §§

41-5-201

through

41-5-203

are inconsistent with the policy of the drainage district act, and do not apply to construction work performed for drainage districts. Dickey v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 39 L.R.A. (n.s.) 868 (1912).